District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.71

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term “Youth” means an individual under 21 years of age who is in the care of the Agency.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III-C, § 371
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-276, § 2, 60 DCR 2060
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-276 added this section.
For temporary addition of this part, see § 2 of the Foster Youth Statements of Rights and Responsibilities Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-622, January 22, 2013, 60 DCR 1338).